apertium-ind.ind.lexc
LEXICON n0
@D.REDUP@@P.REDUP.on@000:@D.REDUP@@P.REDUP.on@%^%[%[%{                                    noun ;
@D.REDUP@@P.REDUP.on@000:@D.REDUP@@P.REDUP.on@%^%[%[%{                                    numeral ;
@D.REDUP@@P.REDUP.on@000:@D.REDUP@@P.REDUP.on@%^%[%[%{                                    adjective ;
@D.REDUP@@P.REDUP.on@000:@D.REDUP@@P.REDUP.on@%^%[%[%{                                    verb ;
                                                                                          noun ;
                                                                                          numeral ;
                                                                                          adjective ;
                                                                                          verb ;




!! -- Section: PREFIX

LEXICON branching
@R.FLAG.numinfl@            numa_suffix ;
@R.FLAG.dernoun@            na_suffix ;
@R.FLAG.deradj@             adja_suffix ;
@R.FLAG.verbinfl@           va_suffix ;
@D.FLAG@                    tagging ;

LEXICON na_suffix
@R.MARK.bare@@R.POS.n@@P.DERNOUN.bare@                                                   f ;
00@R.MARK.bare@@P.DERNOUN.ent@:an@R.MARK.bare@@P.DERNOUN.ent@                            f ;
00@R.MARK.pen@@P.DERNOUN.act@:an@R.MARK.pen@@P.DERNOUN.act@                              f ;
@R.MARK.pen@                                                                             f ;
00@R.MARK.ke@@P.DERNOUN.abstract@:an@R.MARK.ke@@P.DERNOUN.abstract@                      f ;
00@R.MARK.per@@P.DERNOUN.theme@:an@R.MARK.per@@P.DERNOUN.theme@                          f ;


LEXICON numa_suffix
@D.REDUP@                                                                                                     f ;
000@D.REDUP@@R.DERNUM.ord@@P.DERNUM.ref@:nya@D.REDUP@@R.DERNUM.ord@@P.DERNUM.ref@                             f ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.DERNUM.ref@" 0:n 0:y 0:a>             f ;
belas@D.REDUP@                                                                                                f ;
<b e l a s [0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.DERNUM.ref@" 0:n 0:y 0:a>   f ;

LEXICON adja_suffix
@D.REDUP@@R.DERADJ.positive@@R.POS.adj@                                                                                    f ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.NUM.pl@" "@R.POS.adj@" "@R.DERADJ.positive@">      f ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH m e %^N" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@R.POS.v@" "@R.DERADJ.positive@">             f ;
@D.REDUP@@R.DERADJ.sup@                                                                                                    f ;
<"@D.REDUP@" ["@R.DERADJ.exceed@" | "@R.DERADJ.manner@" | "@R.DERADJ.mimic@"] 0:a 0:n>                                     f ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.NUM.pl@" "@R.DERADJ.manner@" 0:a 0:n>              f ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@R.DERADJ.mimic@" 0:a 0:n>                            f ;
@D.REDUP@@R.DERADJ.possib@000:@D.REDUP@@R.DERADJ.possib@nya                                                                f ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@R.DERADJ.possib@" 0:n 0:y 0:a>                       f ;
@D.REDUP@@R.DERADJ.uni@                                                                                                    f ;


LEXICON va_suffix
@D.REDUP@000@P.OBJ.caus@:@D.REDUP@kan@P.OBJ.caus@                                                                   f ;
@D.REDUP@0@P.OBJ.appl@:@D.REDUP@i@P.OBJ.appl@                                                                       f ;
@D.REDUP@@D.MARK@:@D.REDUP@@D.MARK@                                                                                 f ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.NUM.pl@" "@P.OBJ.caus@" 0:k 0:a 0:n>        f ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.NUM.pl@" "@P.OBJ.appl@" 0:i>                f ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.NUM.pl@" "@D.MARK@">                        f ;


LEXICON f
@D.REDUP@        tagging ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.NUM.pl@">        tagging ;


!! -- Section: TAGGING
!! but aslo includes pronoun proclitic and particle

LEXICON tagging
%<vblex%>@R.POS.v@:0@R.POS.v@                                 check_voice ;
%<n%>@R.POS.n@:0@R.POS.n@                                     check_voice ;
%<adj%>@R.POS.adj@:0@R.POS.adj@                               check_voice ;
%<adv%>@R.POS.adv@:0@R.POS.adv@                               check_voice ;
%<num%>@R.POS.num@:0@R.POS.num@                               check_voice ;
%<prn%>@R.POS.prn@:0@R.POS.prn@                               check_voice ;
%<cnjsub%>@R.POS.cnjsub@:0@R.POS.cnjsub@                      check_voice ;
%<cnjcoo%>@R.POS.cnjcoo@:0@R.POS.cnjcoo@                      check_voice ;
%<det%>0@R.POS.det@:0@R.POS.det@                              check_voice ;
%<mod%>0@R.POS.mod@:0@R.POS.mod@                              check_voice ;
%<ij%>0@R.POS.interjection@:0@R.POS.interjection@             check_voice ;
%<qst%>0@R.POS.question@:0@R.POS.question@                    check_voice ;
%<part%>0@R.POS.part@:0@R.POS.part@                           check_voice ;
%<pr%>0@R.POS.pr@:0@R.POS.pr@                                 check_voice ;

LEXICON check_voice
%<actv%>@R.VOICE.av@:0@R.VOICE.av@                            check_aspect ;
%<pasv%>@R.VOICE.pv@:0@R.VOICE.pv@                            check_aspect ;
@D.VOICE@                                                     check_aspect ;

LEXICON check_aspect
%<perf%>@R.ASPECT.perf@:0@R.ASPECT.perf@                      check_verbvariance ;
%<imp%>@R.ASPECT.imperf@:0@R.ASPECT.imperf@                   check_verbvariance ;
@D.ASPECT@                                                    check_verbvariance ;

LEXICON check_verbvariance
%<vbser%>@R.VERBVAR.vbser@:0@R.VERBVAR.vbser@                 check_transitivity ;
%<vbhaver%>@R.VERBVAR.vbhaver@:0@R.VERBVAR.vbhaver@           check_transitivity ;
@D.VERBVAR@                                                   check_transitivity ;

LEXICON check_transitivity
%<caus%>@R.OBJ.caus@:0@R.OBJ.caus@                            check_noun_type ;
%<appl%>@R.OBJ.appl@:0@R.OBJ.appl@                            check_noun_type ;
@D.OBJ@                                                       check_noun_type ;

LEXICON check_noun_type
%<ent%>@R.DERNOUN.ent@:0@R.DERNOUN.ent@                       check_numeral_type ;
%<actio%>@R.DERNOUN.act@:0@R.DERNOUN.act@                     check_numeral_type ;
%<actor%>@R.DERNOUN.actor@:0@R.DERNOUN.actor@                 check_numeral_type ;
%<theme%>@R.DERNOUN.theme@:0@R.DERNOUN.theme@                 check_numeral_type ;
%<abstract%>@R.DERNOUN.abstract@:0@R.DERNOUN.abstract@        check_numeral_type ;
%<bare%>@R.DERNOUN.bare@:0@R.DERNOUN.bare@                    check_numeral_type ;
@D.DERNOUN@                                                   check_numeral_type ;

LEXICON check_numeral_type
%<card%>@R.DERNUM.card@:0@R.DERNUM.card@                      check_person ;
%<ord%>@R.DERNUM.ord@:0@R.DERNUM.ord@                         check_person ;
%<coll%>@R.DERNUM.coll@:0@R.DERNUM.coll@                      check_person ;
%<frac%>@R.DERNUM.frac@:0@R.DERNUM.frac@                      check_person ;
%<ref%>@R.DERNUM.ref@:0@R.DERNUM.ref@                         check_person ;
%<uni%>@R.DERNUM.uni@:0@R.DERNUM.uni@                         check_person ;
@D.DERNUM@                                                    check_person ;

LEXICON adjective
aktual@P.POS.adj@ branching;
anta@P.POS.adj@ branching;
aus@P.POS.adj@        branching ;
belia@P.POS.adj@ branching;
biru@P.POS.adj@        branching ;
cantik@P.POS.adj@:jelita@P.POS.adj@        branching ;
dahsyat@P.POS.adj@        branching ;
dominan@P.POS.adj@ branching;
emeritus@P.POS.adj@ branching;
fiktif@P.POS.adj@ branching;
gilang@P.POS.adj@ branching;
heroik@P.POS.adj@ branching;
implisit@P.POS.adj@ branching;
kabur@P.POS.adj@        branching ;
kognitif@P.POS.adj@ branching;
lacur@P.POS.adj@ branching;
lesi@P.POS.adj@ branching;
mandul@P.POS.adj@        branching ;
mual@P.POS.adj@ branching;
operasional@P.POS.adj@ branching;
penasaran@P.POS.adj@ branching;
rafi@P.POS.adj@ branching;
rugi@P.POS.adj@        branching ;
sendeng@P.POS.adj@ branching;
sosiologis@P.POS.adj@ branching;
tegang@P.POS.adj@        branching ;
unik@P.POS.adj@ branching;
LEXICON adverb
disini@P.POS.adv@        branching ;
sahaja@P.POS.adv@ branching;
sepantasnya@P.POS.adv@ branching;
LEXICON noun
Dr.@P.POS.n@ branching;
Yakobus@P.POS.n@ branching;
ajang@P.POS.n@ branching;
alkali@P.POS.n@ branching;
anda@P.POS.n@        branching ;
appliances@P.POS.n@        branching ;
aset@P.POS.n@ branching;
azab@P.POS.n@        branching ;
balada@P.POS.n@ branching;
basil@P.POS.n@ branching;
belulang@P.POS.n@        branching ;
bibliografi@P.POS.n@ branching;
bom@P.POS.n@ branching;
bungkus@P.POS.n@        branching ;
cecak@P.POS.n@ branching;
corong@P.POS.n@ branching;
dasi@P.POS.n@ branching;
depresi@P.POS.n@ branching;
diktator@P.POS.n@ branching;
dominion@P.POS.n@ branching;
eksistensi@P.POS.n@ branching;
encik@P.POS.n@ branching;
faksi@P.POS.n@ branching;
fitnah@P.POS.n@        branching ;
gaji@P.POS.n@ branching;
gelam@P.POS.n@ branching;
glikogen@P.POS.n@ branching;
gusi@P.POS.n@ branching;
heads@P.POS.n@        branching ;
hop@P.POS.n@ branching;
ikrar@P.POS.n@        branching ;
inisiatif@P.POS.n@ branching;
ira@P.POS.n@        branching ;
jamur@P.POS.n@        branching ;
jodoh@P.POS.n@ branching;
kaidah@P.POS.n@ branching;
kandung@P.POS.n@        branching ;
kariah@P.POS.n@ branching;
kebun@P.POS.n@        branching ;
kemoterapi@P.POS.n@ branching;
ketika@P.POS.n@        branching ;
klasemen@P.POS.n@ branching;
komentar@P.POS.n@ branching;
kongres@P.POS.n@ branching;
koprol@P.POS.n@ branching;
kuartal@P.POS.n@ branching;
kursus@P.POS.n@ branching;
laos@P.POS.n@ branching;
lens@P.POS.n@ branching;
lobi@P.POS.n@ branching;
mad@P.POS.n@ branching;
maling@P.POS.n@ branching;
marka@P.POS.n@ branching;
mekah@P.POS.n@        branching ;
metafisika@P.POS.n@ branching;
ml@P.POS.n@        branching ;
mukim@P.POS.n@ branching;
nanas@P.POS.n@        branching ;
nilai@P.POS.n@ branching;
obor@P.POS.n@ branching;
otak@P.POS.n@ branching;
palma@P.POS.n@ branching;
parfum@P.POS.n@ branching;
pedal@P.POS.n@ branching;
perak@P.POS.n@        branching ;
pestisida@P.POS.n@ branching;
plan@P.POS.n@ branching;
portal@P.POS.n@ branching;
processor@P.POS.n@        branching ;
puding@P.POS.n@        branching ;
raden@P.POS.n@ branching;
rass@P.POS.n@        branching ;
relikui@P.POS.n@ branching;
riadah@P.POS.n@ branching;
rukun@P.POS.n@ branching;
saldo@P.POS.n@ branching;
sasis@P.POS.n@ branching;
selada@P.POS.n@        branching ;
senja@P.POS.n@        branching ;
sia@P.POS.n@ branching;
singgasana@P.POS.n@        branching ;
soda@P.POS.n@ branching;
statistika@P.POS.n@ branching;
sula@P.POS.n@ branching;
sutra@P.POS.n@ branching;
talas@P.POS.n@ branching;
tas@P.POS.n@ branching;
tempo@P.POS.n@ branching;
thuwa@P.POS.n@        branching ;
tongkat@P.POS.n@        branching ;
tsunami@P.POS.n@ branching;
ul@P.POS.n@        branching ;
utang@P.POS.n@        branching ;
wabah@P.POS.n@ branching;
wiski@P.POS.n@ branching;
zulkifli@P.POS.n@        branching ;
LEXICON verb
baur@P.POS.v@        branching ;
bunuh@P.POS.v@        branching ;
ekspor@P.POS.v@        branching ;
hajar@P.POS.v@ branching;
jalan@P.POS.v@        branching ;
khitan@P.POS.v@ branching;
lihat@P.POS.v@        branching ;
mungkir@P.POS.v@        branching ;
perhatikan@P.POS.v@        branching ;
rekat@P.POS.v@ branching;
sekonyong%-konyong@P.POS.v@        branching ;
sulut@P.POS.v@ branching;
tempuh@P.POS.v@ branching;
tunda@P.POS.v@        branching ;
